Illinois, session 104th, SB2919.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Safety Employee Benefits Act is 5amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 320/10)7    Sec. 10. Required health coverage benefits. 8    (a) An employer who employs a full-time law enforcement, 9correctional or correctional probation officer, or 10firefighter, who, on or after the effective date of this Act 11suffers a catastrophic injury or is killed in the line of duty 12shall pay the entire premium of the employer's health 13insurance plan for the injured employee, the injured 14employee's spouse, and for each dependent child of the injured 15employee until the child reaches the age of majority or until 16the end of the calendar year in which the child reaches the age 17of 25 if the child continues to be dependent for support or the 18child is a full-time or part-time student and is dependent for 19support. An individual whose entire premium is paid in 20accordance with this Section shall be offered by the employer 21the choice of any health insurance plan available to currently 22employed full-time law enforcement, correctional or 23correctional probation officers, or firefighters. For purposes   SB2919- 2 -LRB104 19251 SPS 32697 b1of plans administered under the State Employee Group Insurance 2Act of 1971, changes in coverage may only be elected during 3open enrollment or following a qualifying event. The term 4"health insurance plan" does not include supplemental benefits 5that are not part of the basic group health insurance plan. If 6the injured employee subsequently dies, the employer shall 7continue to pay the entire health insurance premium for the 8surviving spouse until remarried and for the dependent 9children under the conditions established in this Section. 10However:11        (1) Health insurance benefits payable from any other 12    source shall reduce benefits payable under this Section.13        (2) It is unlawful for a person to willfully and 14    knowingly make, or cause to be made, or to assist, 15    conspire with, or urge another to make, or cause to be 16    made, any false, fraudulent, or misleading oral or written 17    statement to obtain health insurance coverage as provided 18    under this Section. A violation of this item is a Class A 19    misdemeanor.20        (3) Upon conviction for a violation described in item 21    (2), a law enforcement, correctional or correctional 22    probation officer, or other beneficiary who receives or 23    seeks to receive health insurance benefits under this 24    Section shall forfeit the right to receive health 25    insurance benefits and shall reimburse the employer for 26    all benefits paid due to the fraud or other prohibited   SB2919- 3 -LRB104 19251 SPS 32697 b1    activity. For purposes of this item, "conviction" means a 2    determination of guilt that is the result of a plea or 3    trial, regardless of whether adjudication is withheld.4    (b) In order for the law enforcement, correctional or 5correctional probation officer, firefighter, spouse, or 6dependent children to be eligible for insurance coverage under 7this Act, the injury or death must have occurred as the result 8of the officer's response to fresh pursuit, the officer or 9firefighter's response to what is reasonably believed to be an 10emergency, an unlawful act perpetrated by another, or during 11the investigation of a criminal act. Nothing in this Section 12shall be construed to limit health insurance coverage or 13pension benefits for which the officer, firefighter, spouse, 14or dependent children may otherwise be eligible.15(Source: P.A. 103-340, eff. 1-1-24.)